California statutes. Education Code
(ii) Identify key components of community schools to be tracked yearly in the annual progress report and through the certification process and explore mechanisms by which these components may be assessed at scale.

(iii) Engage with a wide range of education interestholders to solicit their input on central features of community schools’ progress and success that should inform technical assistance, reporting, and accountability consistent with the Community Schools
 framework.

(iv) Identify options to streamline and focus reporting requirements, given other reporting required of schools and local educational agencies. The analyses and recommendations may include changes to other educational planning and reporting mechanisms, including, but not limited to, the local control and accountability plan, the School Plan for Student Achievement, and reporting requirements of the Expanded Learning Opportunities Program, if they can be used to support community schools reporting.

(v) Recommend long-term plan and guidance for the technical assistance structure for community schools in the ongoing funding context, including what an effective, long-term technical assistance structure that is embedded within the larger statewide system of support would look like, and identify potential costs.

(vi) On or before June 30, 2028, produce recommendations for state board consideration and adoption of the analyses.

(B) (i) Up to ten million dollars ($10,000,000), available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031, to develop and implement the schoolsite certification process pursuant to the state board of education-adopted recommendations for accountability.

(ii) The state transformational assistance center, subject to the approval of the state board, may select an entity with demonstrated expertise on the community school model and school accountability, to assist with the development and implementation of the certification process.

(iii) The certification process shall be piloted no later than the 2028–29 school year and implemented no later than October 1, 2031.

(iv) The state transformational assistance center shall engage with education interestholders to solicit their input on a certification process.

(C) (i) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000), available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031, added to the amount specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) to increase the existing amount for the state transformational assistance center and for regional transformational assistance centers. Funds shall be used to support the statewide expansion of community school sites, evaluate the technical assistance structure, and integrate the community
 schools model and supports into the statewide system of support by the time certification begins. The department shall determine how much funding shall be allocated to the state transformational assistance center and regional transformational centers.

(ii) The Legislature and Governor intend to work together to augment the appropriation specified in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 8903, as needed, to support future costs for the state technical assistance structure after June 30, 2031. Any additional funding to support the technical assistance structure shall be subject to an appropriation by the Legislature.

(2) (A) Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, for
 allocation to the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence to provide grants to develop, identify, and implement models of secondary school redesign pursuant to the Secondary School Redesign Pilot Program established by Section 84 of Chapter 8 of the Statutes of 2025.

(B) Grants provided pursuant to this paragraph shall ensure that models of secondary school redesign include before school, after school, summer, or intersession learning opportunities outside of the instructional day for pupils to the extent feasible and are consistent with the Community Schools framework.

(C) Priority for funding shall be given to grantees serving secondary community schools, as defined in Section 8901, that are committed to the Community Schools framework, and that demonstrate strong relationships between pupils, families, staff and community, that center pupil well-being.

(D) The California Collaborative for Educational Excellence may retain up to three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) of the funds described in subparagraph (A) for costs associated with the administration of the model and evaluation of the pilot program. Up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) of the amount appropriated under subparagraph (A) shall be made available to reimburse the Marin County Office of Education, the administrative agent of the collaborative, for costs associated with the administration of the pilot program.

(E) The collaborative, on or before January 1, 2029, shall provide recommendations to the state board for improvements to the framework, developed pursuant to Section 8901.5, consistent with high performing secondary community school models funded and supported under this paragraph.

(3) For the 2026–27 fiscal year of the amount appropriated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8903, six million dollars ($6,000,000), is available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029, for
 the department to contract with the San Bernardino County Office of Education, in partnership with the Sacramento County Office of Education, under the leadership of the state transformational assistance center, to support the continued implementation of Transforming Together, an initiative supported by the Children and Youth Behavioral Health Initiative and California Community Schools Partnership Program that aims to strengthen collaboration between county offices of education and community partners to better meet the behavioral health needs of pupils and families.

(l) Of the amount identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the department shall contract, subject to the approval of the state board, on a competitive basis with at least five local
 educational agencies to serve as regional technical assistance centers to provide technical assistance to local educational agencies seeking to establish, expand, or improve community schools. Preference shall be given to local educational agencies that commit to partnering with institutions of higher education or nonprofit community-based organizations. Technical assistance shall, to the extent practicable, be provided in consultation and collaboration with the statewide system of support established pursuant to Section 52059.5, and be made available to share best practices and assist both prospective applicants and grant recipients with tasks, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Conducting a comprehensive school and community needs and asset assessment.

(2) Improving authentic family and community engagement in the languages spoken in the community.

(3) Creating community partnerships, including, but not limited to, Promise Neighborhoods Initiatives.

(4) Developing sustainable funding sources.

(5) Coordinating services across child-serving agencies and schools.

(6) Accessing and combining funding for services from multiple revenue sources.

(m) Grant recipients and technical assistance centers shall commit to providing program and expenditure data to the department, as specified by the department, and participating in overall program evaluation.

(n) (1) The impact of the grant program in achieving the goals described in this section, including an
 evaluation of the effectiveness of the opportunities provided, shall be included as part of an annual formative evaluation of the program.

(2) The department shall use a competitive grant process to contract with an entity to develop and administer annual formative evaluations. The evaluations shall include all of the following:

(A) Outcome data, as specified by the department and the state board, including measures of pupil well-being and engagement, including, but not limited to, pupil attendance and school climate.

(B) An analysis of the nature and kind of services provided and changes made within the schools, areas of progress, and challenges to be addressed to meet the goals of the California Community Schools Partnership Program, including, but not limited to, effective integration of instructional and pupil
 support services, and support for authentic pupil, educator, and family engagement.

(C) Evidence of best practices and successful strategies for integrating multiple funding sources to meet a local educational agency’s school improvement goals identified in their local control and accountability plan.

(3) (A) The department shall provide a formative evaluation to the Governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by December 31, 2023, and annually thereafter, ending with a final comprehensive report on or before December 31, 2031.

(B) The annual formative evaluations shall be made publicly available on the department’s internet website.

(C) The annual formative evaluations shall be separate from the
 comprehensive report that is required to be submitted on December 31, 2025, to the Governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, pursuant to Section 117 of Chapter 110 of the Statutes of 2020.

(D) The final comprehensive report shall be provided to the Governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature and the state board on the impact of the grant program in achieving the goals described in this section, including an evaluation of the effectiveness of the opportunities provided. The state board shall consider recommendations in this evaluation for revisions to the Community Schools framework, as applicable.

(o) In addition to the amount specified in subdivision (b), the sum of one billion one hundred thirty-two million five hundred fifty-four thousand dollars ($1,132,554,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in
 the 2022–23 fiscal year to the department for allocation beginning in the 2023–24 fiscal year for implementation grants consistent with the purposes and requirements of subdivision (b) and the activities specified in subdivision (k).

(p) (1) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (b) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(2) For purposes of making the computations
 required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (o) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2022–23 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2022–23 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 5.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8903.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(A) The California Community Schools Partnership Act, established as part of the Budget Act of 2021, is a key initiative of California’s historic whole-child transformation of public schools built on the state board-adopted California Community Schools Framework. This model of education incorporates state investments in universal free school meals, universal transitional kindergarten, before and after school learning, career and college readiness, and investments in teacher training, coaching, recruitment, and retention, resulting in a cohesive program of instructional quality and removing barriers to learning, and collaborative leadership.

(B) Implementation of the community schools model results in better home-school connections, academic supports, nutrition, after school and summer school enrichment and care, trauma-informed behavioral and physical health services, and access to social services.

(C) The California Community Schools Framework specifies the pillars of a successful community schools model that results in transformational outcomes: integrated pupil supports, family and community engagement, collaborative leadership and practices for educators and administrators, and extended learning time and opportunities. Successful community school models in California implement this framework with fidelity. It is the intent of the Legislature that the California Community Schools Framework be periodically revised to incorporate updated research and identified needs for statewide school and system improvement.

(D) Research indicates that schools that received grants pursuant to the California Community Schools Partnership Act show significant reductions in chronic absenteeism and suspensions, and improvements in test scores and academic achievement, with the largest gains for historically underserved pupils.

(E) Expansion of the community schools model will increase these positive outcomes, especially for schools that have large concentrations of pupils from low-income families, English language learners, and youth in foster care.

(b) (1) (A) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the Legislature shall initially appropriate the sum of one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) from the General Fund to the department to administer the California Community Schools Partnership Program in the manner
 and for the purposes set forth in this chapter.

(B) This amount may be adjusted each year through Item 6100-115-0001 of the annual Budget Act to provide sufficient funding, pursuant to the formula described in subdivision (c), to all eligible schoolsites that participate in the program.

(2) Funds received pursuant to this section shall be used in accordance with the California Community Schools Framework, as adopted by the state board. These funds shall be used to implement community schools supported by local networks and to implement shared decisionmaking practices with education interestholders and shall not be used for punitive disciplinary practices or the engagement of campus law enforcement.

(3) Funds distributed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) shall supplement, not supplant, funding used for
 services and supports at eligible schoolsites through the local control funding formula pursuant to Section 2574, 2575, or 42238.02, the Expanded Learning Opportunities Program pursuant to Section 46120, or the Literacy Coaches and Reading Specialists Grant Program established pursuant to Sections 53008.5, 53008.7, 53009, and 53009.1.

(c) Funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be distributed each fiscal year as follows:

(1) (A) (i) To local educational agencies to support a network of their eligible schoolsites to implement new, and provide ongoing support for existing, community schools consistent with subparagraphs (B) and (C).

(ii) The allocation calculated pursuant to subparagraph (B) shall be used as to support either a planning period of up to two years
 pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) or the implementation phase described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e). Schoolsites that are ready to implement shall submit to the department a community school plan and evidence of ongoing progress as part of the annual formative evaluation requirements specified by the department pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 8902.

(B) (i) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, for each local educational agency with an eligible schoolsite, the department shall make one of the following computations for each eligible schoolsite based on the following as adjusted pursuant to subparagraph (C):Pupils Enrolled at theEligible SchoolsiteAmount to be Computed perEligible Schoolsite10–24$75,00025–150$115,000151–400$190,000401–1,000$230,0001,001–2,000$305,0002,000+$400,000(ii) Commencing with the 2027–28 fiscal year, the amounts to be computed per eligible schoolsite identified in clause (i) shall be adjusted each fiscal year by the percentage change applied pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02 for that fiscal year.

(iii) A local educational agency with eligible schoolsites that notifies the department of the
 intent to receive an allocation, pursuant to subparagraph (E), under this section shall receive annual payments in accordance with this subparagraph, as adjusted pursuant to subparagraph (C), notwithstanding subsequent changes in pupil data submitted through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System. The annual payments shall remain the same amount and may be adjusted when eligibility is redetermined during the certification process.

(iv) Notwithstanding clause (iii), the department may establish procedures to determine mid-year adjustments to eligibility in cases of an eligible schoolsite restructuring.

(C) An eligible schoolsite that receives an implementation grant pursuant to Section 8902 shall, for the term of its implementation grant, have the allocation listed in subparagraph (B) reduced consistent with the following:

(i) If the total amount of a schoolsite’s implementation grant, divided by five, is greater than or equal to the amount listed in subparagraph (B) for the number of pupils enrolled, the schoolsite shall instead receive no funding under this paragraph for that fiscal year.

(ii) If the total amount of a schoolsite’s implementation grant, divided by five, is less than the amount listed in subparagraph (B) for the number of pupils enrolled, the schoolsite shall instead receive the difference between the total implementation grant amount, divided by five, and the amount specified in subparagraph (B) for the number of pupils enrolled for that fiscal year.

(D) (i) Funds received under this paragraph shall be used for activities consistent with the purposes identified in subdivisions (g) and (h) of Section
 8902.

(ii) A schoolsite that, at the time of the receipt of funds, has not conducted the planning needed to develop the schoolsite implementation plan required pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), shall use the initial funding to develop an implementation plan that demonstrates alignment with the California Community Schools Framework.

(E) (i) On or before November 1, 2026, a local educational agency with an eligible schoolsite shall notify the department of its intent to receive for each eligible schoolsite an allocation under this paragraph as part of the 2026–27 fiscal year cohort, in a manner to be determined by the department. The notification shall include an initial attestation to the department of the local educational agency’s commitment to implementing the community schools model in accordance with the Community School
 framework and state law. The notification shall also include assurances declaring the local educational agency collected signed commitment letters from education interestholders, including, but not limited to, the superintendent of the school district, schoolsite principals, and representatives of teachers, noncertificated staff, pupils, and parents.

(ii) A local educational agency with an eligible schoolsite that is not currently receiving funding pursuant to Section 8902 may submit the required notification of its intent to receive an allocation during an annual June 1 opt-in period. Local educational agencies
 with an eligible schoolsite
 that opt-in by November 1, 2026, or by June 1 of each year shall be eligible to receive apportionment funding as part of a new cohort beginning in the next fiscal year. A local educational agency shall notify the department about its intent for planning phase or implementation phase status as part of the opt-in process.

(iii) As part of the opt-in process, the department shall notify all local educational agencies of the minimum annual reporting requirements for an annual apportionment, and may encourage a local educational agency to pursue a planning period pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), as
 needed, to ensure readiness to implement a new community school.

(2) (A) Up to ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to the department to select, subject to the approval of the executive director of the state board, at least one local educational agency to implement the technical assistance structure and network described in Section 8902 and, beginning in the 2031–32 fiscal year, support costs related to the ongoing certification
 process. Funds shall also be used to provide support and assistance to local educational agencies on an ongoing basis so they can implement the community schools model in accordance with the Community Schools framework and ultimately help their schoolsites maintain their certification. Preference shall be given to county offices of education that commit to partnering with institutions of higher education, nonprofit community-based organizations, and school districts and schoolsites that demonstrate strong implementation of the community schools approach as outlined in the Community Schools framework, as determined by the department with input from education interestholders. The responsibilities of transformational assistance centers shall be aligned with those identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 8902.

(B) The department shall determine the terms, including duration, for each transformational assistance center, subject to
 the approval of the executive director of the state board. The department shall have the authority to renew the selection of the existing transformational assistance centers or reopen the selection process, at the conclusion of each grant term. To determine funding for the transformational assistance structure, the department shall take into consideration the number of community school sites supported by the technical assistance structure.

(C) Technical assistance shall be provided in consultation and collaboration with the statewide system of support established pursuant to Section 52059.5.

(D) Of the amount provided in subparagraph (A), at least two million dollars
 ($2,000,000), subject to the approval of the executive director of the state board, shall be allocated to the local educational agency serving as the state transformational assistance center. The responsibilities of the state transformational assistance center shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(i) Serve as a lead entity within the statewide system of support and work collaboratively with the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, the department, lead agencies in the system, and state agencies that support the implementation of community schools.

(ii) Serve as a centralized hub for the transformational assistance structure to facilitate a coordinated and aligned approach for the ongoing implementation of the community schools initiative.

(iii) Collaborate with the department and relevant education interestholders to develop the annual attestation process and certification process required pursuant to subdivision (d).

(iv) On or before October 31, 2029, submit a report to the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, outlining the certification process informed by the study.

(E) A local educational agency receiving funding under this paragraph shall commit to providing program and expenditure data to the department, as specified by the department, and participating in program evaluation and improvement efforts.

(d) (1) The department shall allocate funding appropriated in Item 6100-115-0001 of the annual Budget Act to county offices of education to coordinate county-level governmental, nonprofit
 community-based organizations, and other external partnerships to support community school implementation at grant recipients in their county. This shall include designating a county-level community schools liaison to coordinate with the department and technical assistance centers in capacity building, resource connection, and continuous improvement activities consistent with supporting grant recipients in their county in implementation of community schools, consistent with the Community Schools framework, as specified in subdivision (e). County office of education grant award amounts under this paragraph shall be determined based on the number of community schools funded pursuant to this section, and the number of pupils served in those schools, using an allocation formula determined by the department, and provide at least two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) and up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) annually, for each qualifying county office of education. These funds are separate from any
 funds county offices of education receive pursuant to subdivision (f) for serving as qualifying entities to a network of community schools.

(2) A county office of education that receives funds pursuant to this subdivision shall support centralized grant recipient communications with county-level governmental partners and funding sources, which may include, but not be limited to, pupil support and health care service billing and billing practices technical assistance, leading a County Children’s Cabinet, and coordination with Promise Neighborhoods lead organizations and agencies.

(3) A county office of education that receives funds pursuant to this subdivision shall do all of the
 following:

(A) Support local educational agency planning and use of pupil and campus data consistent with the guidance of the System of Support Equity Leads, and the state transformational assistance center, for integrating community school, expanded learning, early childhood education, county behavioral health, educator professional development, and other state-funded initiatives integral to the pillars of a community school approach as described in subdivision (b) of Section 8901 and the California Community Schools Partnership Framework described in Section 8901.5, which may be part of the qualifying entity’s local control and accountability plan process pursuant to Section 47606.5, 52060, or 52066, as applicable.

(B) Facilitate professional development and continuous improvement practices, consistent with the Transformational Assistance network, including, but not limited to,
 communities of practice.

(C) Provide fiscal and programmatic reports to the department as requested, regarding the implementation status and needs of local educational agencies in the county.

(D) Coordinate internally with other county offices of education and other county programs and services that can uplift and support the whole child, with the overall goal of moving towards fully integrating county-level community schools implementation supports and services into the larger statewide system of support by embedding these supports and services within the county’s universal and targeted assistance approach once one-time coordination grants conclude.

(4) As a condition of receiving funding pursuant to this subdivision, a county office of education shall adhere to the County Coordination key practices consistent with
 the Community Schools framework, and provide the annual reporting required by the department and the state transformational assistance center.

(e) As a condition of receiving funding pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), a local educational agency shall maintain its community schools pursuant to the Community Schools framework and criteria developed by the transformational assistance structure in partnership with education interestholders, consistent with all of the following:

(1) (A) A local educational agency with schoolsites that are new to the community schools model may use up to two years of its initial apportionment funds to conduct the planning needed to develop a community schools implementation plan pursuant to subparagraph (C) paragraph (2). Upon the conclusion of this
 24-month planning period, the local educational agency shall be required to provide the implementation plan to department and move into the implementation phase.

(B) Funds for planning shall be used to support any of the following:

(i) Staffing costs for a community school coordinator.

(ii) Conducting a comprehensive school and community needs and asset assessment, including, but not limited to, pupil and community demographics, school climate, integrated support services, expanded learning time, educator, family, pupil, and community engagement, new or existing partnerships with governmental entities or community-based organizations, and available funding sources.

(iii) Grant application support, service
 billing development, and other administrative costs necessary to launch a community school model at scale.

(iv) Partnership development and coordination support between the grantee and cooperating agencies, including, but not limited to, a Promise Neighborhood lead agency.

(v) Providing training and support to local educational agency and cooperating agency personnel to develop best practices for integrating instruction and pupil supports.

(vi) Preparing a community school implementation plan for submission to the governing board or body of the local educational agency and to the department. The technical assistance structure and the department may determine the requirements for schoolsite implementation plans.

(vii) Up to 10 percent of the annual allocation may be used by the local education agency for agency-wide planning and support needs, consistent with the Community Schools framework, and as a network lead for multiple eligible schoolsites located in a Promise Neighborhood.

(viii) Providing professional development and strengthening instruction through project-based and experiential learning.

(ix) Implementing social-emotional learning and restorative practices.

(x) Strengthening behavioral health care supports, including, but not limited to, implementation of the Children and Youth Behavioral Health Initiative Fee Schedule pursuant to Section 5961.4 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(xi) Leveraging partnerships to facilitate the whole-child inventory and integrated supports for pupils and schoolsite staff.

(xii) Supporting secondary community school redesign.

(xiii) Convening a schoolsite’s shared decisionmaking team or council that includes pupils, families, community partners, and educators who collaborate with their schoolsite to prepare its community school implementation plan.

(C) (i) A local educational agency that has not provided the department with a satisfactory implementation plan for an eligible schoolsite, as required pursuant to
 subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2), within 24 months of initial apportionment, shall have the apportionment for that eligible schoolsite subtracted by the department in the subsequent fiscal year.

(ii) The department shall work with the technical assistance structure to evaluate whether a local educational agency’s implementation plan is satisfactory.

(2) A local educational agency that has completed planning and is in the implementation phase shall be required to meet the following requirements annually commencing with its first year of implementation:

(A) Ensure that each funded schoolsite has convened a shared decisionmaking team or council that includes pupils, families, community partners, and
 educators.

(B) Support each schoolsite’s shared decisionmaking team or council in developing a schoolsite community school implementation plan that the shared decisionmaking team or council annually presents to its schoolsite.

(C) Provide the department with an implementation plan that was submitted to the governing board or body of the local educational agency. The implementation plan shall include all of the following details:

(i) The prior year’s program and expenditure data and pupil outcomes if applicable.

(ii) A description of how the local educational agency’s approach to community schools aligns with the Community School framework.

(iii) A description of how the local educational
 agency’s approach engages in collaborative leadership with pupils, families, educators, and community partners.

(iv) A description of how the local educational agency’s approach expands services to pupils and leverages and braids funds from existing state initiatives, including, but not limited to, the Expanded Learning Opportunities Program, the Children and Youth Behavioral Health Initiative Fee Schedule program, universal school meals program, California State Preschool Program, and universal transitional kindergarten.

(v) A description of how the local educational agency’s approach assesses technical assistance needs and identifies a plan to address those needs, which may include a local community of practice and connecting to state-led technical assistance opportunities and resources; and a plan for the school year.

(vi) Each eligible schoolsite’s community schools implementation plan.

(D) Annually report and publicly present its community schools implementation plan at a meeting of the governing board or body of the local educational agency. The local educational agency shall publicly post its community schools implementation plan on the local educational agency’s and the schoolsites’ internet websites.

(E) A local educational agency with an Expanded Learning Opportunities Program allocation or an After School Education and Safety Program grant may submit those programs’ respective implementation plans as part of its community school implementation plan.

(F) (i) Submit an annual progress report that includes an attestation that their community schoolsites are providing wraparound supports to
 pupils and is implementing community schools in accordance with the California Community Schools Framework as adopted by the state board. The technical assistance structure shall utilize the annual progress report to provide support to local educational agencies and schoolsites on implementation and continuous improvement of their community schools models.

(ii) The annual progress report requirements, including the attestation of the community school’s commitment to the framework, shall be developed by the state transformational assistance center in collaboration with the department and education interestholders. The annual progress report shall be aligned and consistent with the Community Schools framework and the annual progress report required for recipients of the one-time implementation grants pursuant to Section 8902 to the extent feasible. A local educational agency that received one-time implementation grants may submit the existing
 annual progress report to fulfill the requirement for the duration of its grant period pursuant to Section 8902.

(3) As a condition of receiving funding pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), a local educational agency shall commit to providing program and expenditure data to the department, as specified by the department, and participating in program evaluation and improvement efforts.

(4) (A) It is the intent of the Legislature that, beginning in the 2031–32 fiscal year, a local educational agency’s schoolsites will be required to participate in a seven-year certification process conducted by an external certification entity and managed through the state transformational assistance center to ensure quality community school models are implemented with fidelity. Only schoolsites that are certified through this process shall be eligible to receive
 ongoing community schools funding under paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(B) A local educational agency’s apportionment generated for a schoolsite that loses its certification may be deemed ineligible to continue receiving an apportionment for that schoolsite, subject to the determination of the department. If a schoolsite loses its certification, the local educational agency may continue receiving a community schools apportionment for that schoolsite until the schoolsite’s current certification period expires. A local educational agency shall not receive renewed funding for an uncertified schoolsite until the schoolsite meets certification standards again.

(C) A local educational agency that is interested in establishing a new community school at, or renewing funding for, an eligible schoolsite
 may submit the required notification of its intent to receive an allocation pursuant to clause (i) or (ii) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c). The details for the requests shall be determined by the department in collaboration with the transformational assistance centers and education interestholders.

(f) A local educational agency may retain up to 10 percent of the total funds awarded pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) for its eligible schoolsites each fiscal year. These funds shall be used to administer community schools established at eligible schoolsites, manage professional learning and networking, and
 coordinate services and funding streams for community schools under the local educational agency with eligible schoolsites. Funds retained by the local educational agency to provide direct services to pupils may be retained separately from this administrative set-aside.

(g) A local educational agency receiving funding under paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) shall commit to communicating and collaborating with the transformational assistance centers, as often as the transformational assistance centers may reasonably require, to discuss the implementation of community schoolsites, potential challenges facing the local educational agency during implementation, and best practices that can be shared with peer community schoolsites.

(h) A local educational agency that receives funds under paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) for an eligible schoolsite that has closed, as reported pursuant to
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 60900, shall return any unspent funds received for that closed schoolsite to the department. The local educational agency shall report the total amount of unspent funds in accordance with instructions and forms prescribed and furnished by the department. Any returned funds that are not reallocated shall revert to the General Fund.

(i) If funds appropriated for the purpose of this section remain after all apportionments pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) have been made, the balance that exceeds that amount shall revert to the General Fund by June 30 of each year.

(j) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations made by subdivision (b) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section
 41202, for the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 6.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. California State Summer School for the Arts [8950. - 8957.]